Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202623-1901.02
County surveyor; deputy; appointment; oath; duties.

The county surveyor may appoint a deputy for whose acts he or she will be responsible. The surveyor may not appoint the county treasurer, sheriff, register of deeds, or clerk as deputy.

In counties having a population of one hundred thousand but less than one hundred fifty thousand, if the county surveyor is a professional engineer, he or she shall appoint as deputy a professional land surveyor or, if the county surveyor is a professional land surveyor, he or she shall appoint as deputy a professional engineer. This requirement shall not apply if the county surveyor is both a professional engineer and a professional land surveyor.

The appointment shall be in writing and revocable in writing by the surveyor. Both the appointment and revocation shall be filed and kept in the office of the county clerk.

The deputy shall take the same oath as the surveyor which shall be endorsed upon and filed with the certificate of appointment. The surveyor may require a bond of the deputy.

In the absence or disability of the surveyor, the deputy shall perform the duties of the surveyor pertaining to the office, but when the surveyor is required to act in conjunction with or in place of another officer, the deputy cannot act in the surveyor's place.

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB200, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB791, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 4.